Illinois, session 104th, SB2735.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-5 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 30/25-5 new)7    Sec. 25-5. Quick-take; City of North Chicago.     8    Quick-take proceedings under Article 20 may be used for a 9period of one year after the effective date of this amendatory 10Act of the 104th General Assembly by the City of North Chicago 11for the acquisition of permanent and temporary easements for 12the purpose of construction of a storm water utility main, 13described as follows: 14Part of 12-07-400-001, 30417 N. Skokie Highway15Part of 12-07-400-002, 30347 N. Skokie Highway16Part of 12-07-400-008, 30375 N. Skokie Highway 17Permanent Easement:18    THAT PART OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION 7, TOWNSHIP 19    44 NORTH, RANGE 12 EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN IN 20    LAKE COUNTY, ILLINOIS BEING DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:21    COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID SOUTHEAST   SB2735 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16039 JRC 29301 b1    QUARTER OF SECTION 7; THENCE EASTERLY ALONG THE NORTH LINE 2    OF SAID SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION 7 HAVING AN ILLINOIS 3    COORDINATE SYSTEM (EAST ZONE) GRID BEARING OF SOUTH 89 4    DEGREES 38 MINUTES 33 SECONDS EAST, A DISTANCE OF 44.77 5    FEET TO A POINT ON THE EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF U.S. ROUTE 6    41 (A.K.A. SKOKIE HIGHWAY)AS DEDICATED BY DOCUMENT 7    NO.402908 RECORDED AUGUST 13, 1934, SAID EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY 8    LINE BEING A 4487.46 FOOT RADIUS CURVE, CONCAVE WESTERLY; 9    THENCE SOUTHERLY ALONG SAID CURVE AND EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY 10    LINE 676.18 FEET (THE CHORD BEARS SOUTH 04 DEGREES 00 11    MINUTES 38 SECONDS EAST, 675.54 FEET) TO THE POINT OF 12    BEGINNING; THENCE SOUTH 89 DEGREES 43 MINUTES 08 SECONDS 13    EAST, 102.91 FEET; THENCE NORTH 76 DEGREES 47 MINUTES 23 14    SECONDS EAST, 39.78 FEET TO A POINT ON A LINE 34.25 FEET 15    SOUTHWESTERLY OF AND PARALLEL WITH THE CENTER LINE OF THE 16    TWO MAIN TRACKS OF THE CHICAGO AND NORTHWESTERN RAILROAD 17    (THE EAST MAIN TRACK HAS SINCE BEEN REMOVED); THENCE SOUTH 18    13 DEGREES 12 MINUTES 37 SECONDS EAST, 10.00 FEET ALONG 19    SAID PARALLEL LINE TO A POINT ON A LINE BEING 20    PERPENDICULAR TO SAID PARALLEL LINE AT A POINT BEING 21    698.00 FEET SOUTHEASTERLY FROM SAID NORTH LINE OF THE 22    SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION 7 AS MEASURED ALONG A LINE 23    BEING 54.25 FEET SOUTHWESTERLY OF AND PARALLEL WITH SAID 24    CENTER LINE OF THE TWO MAIN TRACKS OF THE CHICAGO AND 25    NORTHWESTERN RAILROAD; THENCE SOUTH 76 DEGREES 47 MINUTES 26    23 SECONDS WEST, 20.00 FEET ALONG SAID PERPENDICULAR LINE   SB2735 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16039 JRC 29301 b1    TO A POINT ON SAID LINE BEING 54.25 FEET SOUTHWESTERLY OF 2    AND PARALLEL WITH THE CENTER LINE OF THE TWO MAIN TRACKS OF 3    THE CHICAGO AND NORTHWESTERN RAILROAD; THENCE SOUTH 13 4    DEGREES 12 MINUTES 37 SECONDS EAST, 20.46 FEET ALONG SAID 5    PARALLEL LINE; THENCE NORTH 89 DEGREES 43 MINUTES 08 6    SECONDS WEST, 129.28 FEET TO A POINT ON SAID EAST 7    RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF U.S. ROUTE 41; THENCE NORTH 00 8    DEGREES 21 MINUTES 37 SECONDS EAST, 22.84 FEET ALONG SAID 9    EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE TO A POINT ON SAID 4487.46 FOOT 10    RADIUS CURVE, CONCAVE WESTERLY; THENCE NORTHERLY ALONG 11    SAID CURVE AND EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE 2.16 FEET (THE CHORD 12    BEARS NORTH 00 DEGREES 19 MINUTES 11 SECONDS EAST, 2.16 13    FEET)TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING. 14Temporary Easement:15    THAT PART OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION 7, TOWNSHIP 16    44 NORTH, RANGE 12 EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN IN 17    LAKE COUNTY, ILLINOIS BEING DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:18    COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID SOUTHEAST 19    QUARTER OF SECTION 7; THENCE EASTERLY ALONG THE NORTH LINE 20    OF SAID SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION 7 HAVING AN ILLINOIS 21    COORDINATE SYSTEM (EAST ZONE) GRID BEARING OF SOUTH 89 22    DEGREES 38 MINUTES 33 SECONDS EAST, A DISTANCE OF 44.77 23    FEET TO A POINT ON THE EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF U.S. ROUTE 24    41 (A.K.A. SKOKIE HIGHWAY)AS DEDICATED BY DOCUMENT 25    NO.402908 RECORDED AUGUST 13, 1934, SAID EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY   SB2735 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16039 JRC 29301 b1    LINE BEING A 4487.46 FOOT RADIUS CURVE, CONCAVE WESTERLY; 2    THENCE SOUTHERLY ALONG SAID CURVE AND EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY 3    LINE 631.18 FEET (THE CHORD BEARS SOUTH 04 DEGREES 17 4    MINUTES 52 SECONDS EAST, 630.66 FEET) TO THE POINT OF 5    BEGINNING; THENCE SOUTH 89 DEGREES 43 MINUTES 08 SECONDS 6    EAST, 85.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 00 DEGREES 16 MINUTES 52 7    SECONDS EAST, 55.00 FEET; THENCE SOUTH 89 DEGREES 43 8    MINUTES 08 SECONDS EAST, 35.03 FEET TO A POINT ON A LINE 9    34.25 FEET SOUTHWESTERLY OF AND PARALLEL WITH THE CENTER 10    LINE OF THE TWO MAIN TRACKS OF THE CHICAGO AND 11    NORTHWESTERN RAILROAD (THE EAST MAIN TRACK HAS SINCE BEEN 12    REMOVED); THENCE SOUTH 13 DEGREES 12 MINUTES 37 SECONDS 13    EAST, 93.29 FEET ALONG SAID PARALLEL LINE; THENCE SOUTH 76 14    DEGREES 47 MINUTES 23 SECONDS WEST, 39.78 FEET; THENCE 15    NORTH 89 DEGREES 43 MINUTES 08 SECONDS WEST, 102.91 FEET 16    TO A POINT ON SAID EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF U.S. ROUTE 41; 17    THENCE NORTHERLY ALONG SAID 4487.46 FOOT RADIUS CURVE AND 18    EAST RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE 45.00 FEET (THE CHORD BEARS NORTH 19    00 DEGREES 01 MINUTES 08 SECONDS EAST, 45.00 FEET)TO THE 20    POINT OF BEGINNING.  21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.